Wisconsin, session 2025, AB928.
do enact as follows:Law Revision Committee prefatory note: This bill is a remedial legislation proposal, requested by the Department of Agriculture, Trade and Consumer Protection and introduced by the Law Revision Committee under s. 13.83 (1) (c) 4. and 5., stats. After careful consideration of the various provisions of the bill, the Law Revision Committee has determined that this bill makes minor substantive changes in the statutes, and that these changes are desirable as a matter of public policy.AB928,11Section 1. 95.51 (2) (b) 4. of the statutes is amended to read:AB928,2,5295.51 (2) (b) 4. The type of livestock kept at each location under subd. 3. and 3the type of livestock operation, using standards and guidelines from the national 4animal identification plan developed by the animal and plant health inspection 5service of the federal department of agriculture, to the extent practicable.Note: Under current law, a person who keeps certain kinds of livestock must register with the Department of Agriculture, Trade and Consumer Protection and provide to that department information regarding the type of livestock kept at each registered location and the type of livestock operation. This information must be submitted using standards and guidelines from the National Animal Identification Plan (NAIP) developed by the Animal and Plant Health Inspection Service of the U.S. Department of Agriculture, to the extent practicable. This Section eliminates the requirement that this information be submitted using guidelines and standards from the NAIP because it is no longer in effect.AB928,2,66